Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Debtors Owing Money to the State

4-51-201. Purpose — Construction.

The purpose of this part is to establish a policy and to provide a system whereby all claimant agencies of this state in conjunction with the corporation shall cooperate in identifying debtors who owe money to the state through its various claimant agencies or to persons on whose behalf the state and its claimant agencies act and who qualify for prizes under part 1 of this chapter from the corporation. It is also the purpose of this part to establish procedures for setting off against any such prize the sum of any debt owed to the state or to persons on whose behalf the state and its claimant agencies act. It is the intent of the general assembly that this part be liberally construed to effectuate these purposes.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Claimant agency” means any state agency, department, board, bureau, commission, or authority to which an individual owes a debt or that acts on behalf of an individual to collect a debt;

“Debt” means any liquidated sum due and owing any claimant agency, which sum has accrued through contract, subrogation, tort, or operation of law, regardless of whether there is an outstanding judgment for the sum or any sum that is due and owing any person and is enforceable by the state or any of the claimant agencies of the state. “Debt” specifically includes, but is not limited to, uncollected amounts owed by any person due to judgments for overdue child support as provided by title 36, chapter 5;

“Debtor” means any individual owing money or having a delinquent account with any claimant agency, which obligation has not been adjudicated as satisfied by court order, set aside by court order, or discharged in bankruptcy. “Debtor” specifically includes, but is not limited to, all persons who are required by any order to pay child support and whose payments are overdue as provided by title 36, chapter 5, and which payments have become judgments by operation of law pursuant to § 36-5-101(a)(5), or by law in any other state or territory, or by judgment of a court in this or any other state or territory; and

“Prize” means the proceeds of any lottery prize awarded under part 1 of this chapter.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-203. Collection remedy.

The collection remedy authorized by this part is in addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy available by law.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Cross-References. Default and enforcement of security interest, §47-9-601 et seq.

4-51-204. List of debtors — Withholding winnings — Ranking of liens.

Any claimant agency may submit to the corporation a list of the names of all persons owing debts in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) to such claimant agency or to persons on whose behalf the claimant agency is acting. The full amount of the debt shall be collectable from any lottery winnings without regard to limitations on the amounts that may be collectable in increments through garnishment or other proceedings. Such list, filed by paper or by electronic means, shall constitute a valid lien upon and claim of lien against the lottery winnings of any debtor named in such list. The list shall contain the names of the debtors, their social security numbers, if available, and any other information that would assist the corporation in identifying the debtors named in the list.

The corporation may establish with any claimant agency that has such capability an automated process utilizing the corporation's and the claimant agency's databases to effectuate this part including, but not limited to, a computerized matching process.

The corporation is authorized and directed to withhold any winnings subject to the lien created by this part and send notice to the winner by certified mail, return receipt requested, of such action and the reason the winnings were withheld; provided, however, that if the winner appears and claims winnings in person, the corporation shall notify the winner at that time by hand delivery of such action.

If the debtor does not protest the withholding of such winnings in writing within thirty (30) days of such notice, the corporation shall pay the funds over to the claimant agency. Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3), if the debtor protests the withholding of such winnings within thirty (30) days of such notice, the corporation shall file an action in interpleader in the circuit court of the county in which the debtor resides if the debtor resides in this state. If the debtor does not reside in this state, such action shall be filed in Davidson County. The corporation shall pay the disputed sum into the clerk of the court and give notice to the claimant agency and debtor of the initiation of such action.

For all persons who are debtors of the department of human services due to overdue child support, the corporation shall withhold all winnings subject to administrative proceedings in accordance with title 36, chapter 5 and the rules of the department.

The liens created by this part shall rank among themselves as follows:

Taxes due the state;

Delinquent child support; and

All other judgments and liens in order of the date entered or perfected.

The corporation shall not be required to deduct claimed debts from prizes paid out by retailers or entities other than the corporation.

Any list of debt provided pursuant to this part shall be provided periodically as the corporation shall provide by rules and regulations and the corporation shall not be obligated to retain such lists or deduct debts appearing on such lists beyond the period determined by such rules and regulations; provided, however, that lists provided to the corporation through an automatic data match process shall be maintained on an ongoing basis to enable the continuous monitoring and withholding of lottery winnings for debts due any claimant agency.

Pursuant to § 4-51-105(a)(3), the corporation is authorized to prescribe forms and promulgate rules and regulations that it deems necessary to carry out this part.

The corporation and any claimant agency shall incur no civil or criminal liability for good faith adherence to this section.

The claimant agency shall pay the corporation for all costs incurred by the corporation in setting off debts in the manner provided in this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

4-51-205. Confidential information.

Pursuant to § 4-51-124, the corporation shall provide to a claimant agency all information necessary to accomplish and effectuate the intent of this part.

The information obtained by a claimant agency from the corporation in accordance with this part shall retain its confidentiality and shall only be used by a claimant agency in the pursuit of its debt collection duties and practices. Any employee or prior employee of any claimant agency who discloses any such information for any other purpose, except as otherwise specifically authorized by law, shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty dollars ($50.00), which shall be collected by the claimant agency as otherwise provided by law.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-51-206. Application.

This part shall only apply to prizes of six hundred dollars ($600) or more.

Acts 2003, ch. 297, § 2.